Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-1020
Cities of the First Class Firefighters Retirement Act, how cited; applicability.

(1) Sections 16-1020 to 16-1042 shall be known and may be cited as the Cities of the First Class Firefighters Retirement Act.

(2) Except as provided in section 16-1039, sections 16-1020 to 16-1038 shall apply to all firefighters of a city of the first class.

Laws 1983, LB 531, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB686, § 1.